District of Columbia statutes.
41-301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“By type of property” means the 4 distinct types of property: real property, vehicles, currency, and other personal property.

(2)

“Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Currency” means cash, or the fair market value of seized property disposed of pursuant to § 41-303(e).

(4)

“Forfeitable offense” means an alleged violation of District law that can give rise to forfeiture pursuant to the following provisions: § 7-2507.06a, § 8-905, § 22-902, § 22-1705, § 22-2723, § 48-905.02, or § 50-1501.04.

(5)

“Indigent” means a person who is financially unable to give any bond or give a bond in the required amount.

(6)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or the Mayor’s designee.

(7)

“Owner” means a person with a legal ownership interest in the property subject to seizure or forfeiture.

(8)

“Relative” means a spouse, partner, sibling, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, or the spouse, partner, or child thereof.

(9)

“Sale proceeds” means all funds received by the District of Columbia as a result of the sale of seized property pursuant to § 41-303(e) or § 41-310.

June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 101, 62 DCR 1920